Alabama, session 2026rs, HB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
62 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
63 the Alabama Conscientious Right to Refuse Act.
64 Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
65 following terms have the following meanings:
66 (1) DISCRIMINATE or DISCRIMINATION. The discharge,
67 refusal to hire, refusal to promote, demotion, harassment,
68 segregation, or discrimination in matters of compensation or
69 benefits against an employee. This term includes any
70 imposition, requirement, or burden on one class of employees
71 that is not mandated for all other employees.
72 (2) EMPLOYER. Any person that accepts the services of
73 another, including, but not limited to, the services of an
74 independent contractor or volunteer.
75 (b) An employer or prospective employer shall not
76 discriminate against an otherwise qualified individual on the
77 basis of the individual's refusal of any biologic, DNA-based
78 product, drug, facial covering, gene editing technology,
79 pharmaceutical, RNA-based product, or vaccine for reasons of
80 conscience, including religious convictions, with regard to
81 job application procedures; the hiring, advancement, or
82 discharge of employees; employee compensation; job training;
83 or other terms, conditions, or privileges of employment.
84 (c)(1) Any individual who is subject to discrimination
Page 3

(c)(1) Any individual who is subject to discrimination
HB12 INTRODUCED
85 in violation of this section may seek a preliminary or
86 permanent injunction before a circuit court of competent
87 jurisdiction to enforce this section. A circuit court may
88 enter any order necessary to remedy the violation, assess
89 penalties, and award reasonable attorney fees and costs,
90 including expert fees, to a prevailing plaintiff.
91 (2) No security in any form may be required for an
92 action filed under this subsection.
93 (d)(1) The Attorney General may enforce the provisions
94 of this section.
95 (2) If an employer or prospective employer is subject
96 to federal fines, penalties, or mandates: (i) due to its
97 compliance with this section; or (ii) which conflict with the
98 requirements of this section, the Attorney General may defend
99 or participate in the suit on behalf of the employer or
100 prospective employer in order to protect its right to comply
101 with this section.
102 Section 3. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
103 following terms have the following meanings:
104 (1) DISCRIMINATE or DISCRIMINATION. The denial of the
105 opportunity of an individual or class to participate in an
106 equal manner as all other individuals, not separate or
107 segregated, or the denial of equal benefit from the goods,
108 services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or
109 accommodations of a place of public accommodation.
110 (2) IMMUNIZATION STATUS. Whether an individual has the
111 presence or absence of antibodies or has received or has not
112 received any vaccination, including biologics, a DNA-based
Page 4

received any vaccination, including biologics, a DNA-based
HB12 INTRODUCED
113 product, gene editing technology, pharmaceutical, or an
114 RNA-based product administered for the purpose of preventing
115 an infectious disease.
116 (3) PUBLIC ACCOMODATION. The same meaning as provided
117 in Title III of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C.
118 § 12181.
119 (b) A place of public accommodation shall not
120 discriminate against any individual on the basis of the
121 individual's immunization status or refusal to wear a facial
122 covering for reasons of conscience, including religious
123 convictions, by denying or restricting in any way the
124 individual's full and equal enjoyment of goods, services,
125 facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations of the
126 place of public accommodation.
127 (c)(1) Any individual who is subject to discrimination
128 in violation of this section may seek a preliminary or
129 permanent injunction before a circuit court of competent
130 jurisdiction to enforce this section. A circuit court may
131 enter any order necessary to remedy the violation, assess
132 penalties, and award reasonable attorney fees and costs,
133 including expert fees, to a prevailing plaintiff.
134 (2) No security in any form may be required for an
135 action filed under this subsection.
136 (d)(1) The Attorney General may enforce the provisions
137 of this section.
138 (2) If a place of public accommodation is subject to
139 federal fines, penalties, or mandates: (i) due to its
140 compliance with this act; or (ii) which conflict with the
Page 5

compliance with this act; or (ii) which conflict with the
HB12 INTRODUCED
141 requirements of this act, the Attorney General may defend or
142 participate in the suit on behalf of the place of public
143 accommodation in order to protect its right to comply with
144 this section.
145 Section 4. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
146 following terms have the following meanings:
147 (1) DISCRIMINATE or DISCRIMINATION. The denial or
148 restriction of medical care, public service, or insurance
149 coverage, payments, reimbursements, or claims to an
150 individual.
151 (2) HEALTH PLAN INSURER. All health insurance plan
152 issuers doing business in Alabama, including any public or
153 private medical insurance program.
154 (3) HOSPITALS. The same meaning as provided in Section
155 22-21-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
156 (b) A hospital or health plan insurer shall not
157 discriminate in any way or take any adverse action against:
158 (i) an individual based on the individual's refusal; or (ii)
159 an unemancipated minor based on the refusal made on the
160 minor's behalf by his or her parent, guardian, or legal
161 representative, of any biologic, DNA-based product, drug,
162 facial covering, gene editing technology, pharmaceutical,
163 RNA-based product, or vaccine for reasons of conscience,
164 including religious convictions, including, but not limited
165 to, through:
166 (1) Denying a service, including medical care, a public
167 service, or organ donation, to the individual;
168 (2) Penalizing the individual or using financial
Page 6

(2) Penalizing the individual or using financial
HB12 INTRODUCED
169 coercion against the individual; or
170 (3) Refusing or restricting insurance coverage,
171 payments, reimbursements, or claims to an individual.
172 (c)(1) For the purposes of this section, the term
173 "facial covering" does not include a surgical mask worn during
174 the performance of a surgical, medical, or dental procedure.
175 (2) This section may not be construed to prevent the
176 recommendation of, education on, or access to a facial
177 covering or other medical intervention specified in this
178 section.
179 (d)(1) Any individual who is subject to discrimination
180 or adverse action in violation of this section may seek a
181 preliminary or permanent injunction before a circuit court of
182 competent jurisdiction to enforce this act. A circuit court
183 may enter any order necessary to remedy the violation, assess
184 penalties, and award reasonable attorney fees and costs,
185 including expert fees, to a prevailing plaintiff.
186 (2) No security in any form may be required for an
187 action filed under this subsection.
188 (e)(1) The Attorney General may enforce the provisions
189 of this section.
190 (2) If a hospital or health plan insurer is subject to
191 federal fines, penalties, or mandates: (i) due to its
192 compliance with this section; or (ii) which conflict with the
193 requirements of this section, the Attorney General may defend
194 or participate in the suit on behalf of the hospital or health
195 plan insurer in order to protect its right to comply with this
196 section.
Page 7

section.
HB12 INTRODUCED
197 Section 5. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
198 following terms have the following meanings:
199 (1) IMMUNIZATION STATUS. The same meaning as provided
200 in Section 3.
201 (2) OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING BOARD. The same meaning as
202 provided in Section 41-9A-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
203 (b) An occupational licensing board shall not deny,
204 suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate a
205 license, as defined by Section 41-9A-1, Code of Alabama 1975,
206 because of the immunization status of the licensee or
207 applicant for a license.
208 (c)(1) Any individual who is subject to any action
209 described in subsection (b) by an occupational licensing board
210 may seek a preliminary or permanent injunction before a
211 circuit court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this
212 section. A circuit court may enter any order necessary to
213 remedy the violation, assess penalties, and award reasonable
214 attorney fees and costs, including expert fees, to a
215 prevailing plaintiff.
216 (2) No security in any form may be required for an
217 action filed under this subsection.
218 (d)(1) The Attorney General may enforce the provisions
219 of this section.
220 (2) If an occupational licensing board is subject to
221 federal fines, penalties, or mandates: (i) due to its
222 compliance with this section; or (ii) which conflict with the
223 requirements of this section, the Attorney General may defend
224 or participate in the suit on behalf of the occupational
Page 8

or participate in the suit on behalf of the occupational
HB12 INTRODUCED
225 licensing board in order to protect its right to comply with
226 this section.
227 Section 6. This act shall become effective on June 1,
228 2026.
Page 9